REGARDING  SPYWARE

S.  HRG.  109–406

HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON TRADE, TOURISM, AND 

ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

OF THE

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

OCTOBER  5,  2005

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation

(

27–822 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2006

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:20 Jun 14, 2006 Jkt 027822 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMint,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  TRADE,  TOURISM,  AND  ECONOMIC  DEVELOPMENT 

GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon,  Chairman 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMint,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota,  Ranking 
DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

(II)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:20 Jun 14, 2006 Jkt 027822 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on October 5, 2005 ............................................................................
Statement of Senator Allen .....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Burns ...................................................................................
Statement of Senator Bill Nelson ...........................................................................
Statement of Senator Smith ...................................................................................

Page 
1
3
3
2
1

Majoras, Hon. Deborah P., Chairman, Federal Trade Commission ....................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................

5
9

WITNESSES 

Response  to  Written  Questions  Submitted  by  Hon.  Frank  R.  Lautenberg 
to Hon. Deborah P. Majoras ................................................................................

25

APPENDIX 

(III)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:20 Jun 14, 2006 Jkt 027822 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:20 Jun 14, 2006 Jkt 027822 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

REGARDING  SPYWARE 

WEDNESDAY,  OCTOBER  5,  2005

SUBCOMMITTEE ON TRADE, TOURISM, AND ECONOMIC 
DEVELOPMENT, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  2:35  p.m.  in  room 
SD–562,  Dirksen  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Gordon  H.  Smith, 
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. GORDON H. SMITH,

U.S. SENATOR FROM OREGON 

Senator  SMITH.  I  want  to  thank  my  colleagues  for  being  here,  I 
know  they  share  with  me  a  deep  interest  and  concern  about  the 
matter  of  spyware.  I  want  to  thank  Chairman  Majoras  for  rear-
ranging her schedule to be here today. 

As  Chairman  of  the  Subcommittee  on  Trade,  Tourism,  and  Eco-
nomic  Development,  which  has  primary  jurisdiction  over  the  Fed-
eral Trade Commission and online-privacy issues, I have a deep in-
terest as colleagues do in spyware and have continually worked on 
these issues to ensure protection of consumers and businesses. 

The FTC also has a responsibility to protect American consumers 

from all types of fraud and deception, including spyware. 

According to a recent survey by the National Cyber Security Alli-
ance,  93  percent  of  people  feel  that  spyware  is  a  serious  problem, 
and 61 percent believe that Congress should be doing more to com-
bat the problem. Consumers have now downloaded free versions of 
the  two  most  widely  used  anti-spyware  programs  over  45  million 
times. 

Although spyware has been used for many deceitful purposes, in-
cluding  theft  of  personal  information,  the  technology  behind  it  is 
being  used  also  toward  legitimate  ends  as  well.  I  strongly  believe 
that  a  total  ban  of  an  entire  category  of  technology  or  product  can 
have  many  unintended  and  serious  consequences.  If  the  definition 
of  spyware  becomes  too  broad,  legislation  adopted  in  haste  might 
not  take  into  account  the  evolution  of  future  technologies,  and  in 
turn, it could stifle innovation. 

I believe we must limit the abusive and deceitful practices which 
are  allowing  industry  the  ability  to  build  on  and  improve  existing 
technologies. To that end, I introduced the U.S. SAFE WEB Act to 
expand  the  Federal  Trade  Commission’s  current  authority  to  en-
force existing laws and allow the agency to coordinate with foreign 
law  enforcement  officials  to  prosecute  deceptive  online  activities.  I 

(1)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:20 Jun 14, 2006 Jkt 027822 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

2

have  also  co-sponsored  legislation  with  Senator  Allen  to  increase 
the FTC’s current authority to enforce existing laws to prevent de-
ceitful acts of spyware. 

We need to give the FTC the necessary tools to go after the indi-
viduals  who  are  already  violating  current  Federal  law.  We  need  to 
address the most egregious activities and behaviors online without 
placing  unnecessary  restrictions  on  the  entire  technology  industry. 
Americans  must  be  proactive  in  keeping  our  high-tech  industry 
on  the  cutting  edge  in  the  world  market.  I  believe  that  an  appro-
priate  balance  can  be  found  between  limiting  the  illegitimate  use 
of  existing  technologies  and  allowing  for  technology  industry  to 
grow, expand, and innovate. 

As  we  continue  to  address  this  issue,  I  look  forward  to  working 
with  all  of  my  colleagues  to  confront  this  growing  problem  appro-
priately and in a timely manner. 

With that I’ll go to Senator Nelson. 

STATEMENT OF HON. BILL NELSON,

U.S. SENATOR FROM FLORIDA 

Senator  NELSON.  I’ll  go  to  praising  you  Senator  Burns,  because 

you and I have sponsored the bill to address spyware problems. 

Senator BURNS. That’s right. 
Senator  NELSON.  Everything  that  Senator  Smith  has  said  is  ac-
curate.  Spyware  invades  our  privacy,  leads  to  identity  theft,  ex-
poses  children  to  pornography,  aids  corporate  espionage,  threatens 
E-Commerce, and it clearly has national security implications. And 
technology and the private marketplace haven’t found a solution to 
stop spyware, so we now need a tough Federal law Mr. Chairman, 
that clearly defines illegal conduct and gives the government more 
tools to go after the spyware companies. 

And  so  Senator  Burns  and  I  are  sponsoring  this  bill  called  the 
Spy Block Act, along with Senators Wyden, Snowe and Boxer. And 
last  year  we  reported  this  bill  out  of  the  Committee  on  a  unani-
mous vote. And it has one simple principle, empower consumers to 
decide  for  themselves  what  software  is  installed  on  their  com-
puters.  Now  Senator  Allen  and  others  have  introduced  another 
spyware bill, I think that one is a little narrow in scope but it has 
some  very  strong  components.  So  what  I  want  to  do  is,  all  of  us 
to  work  together  to  merge  the  two  approaches  and  get  a  spyware 
bill marked up, so we can get it moving. 

The House has already passed two such bills, but it continues to 

wait on the Senate to act. 

Thank you Mr. Chairman. 
Senator SMITH. Thank you Senator Nelson, and I do look forward 
to  working  with  you  on  this.  I  think  we  both  share  the  belief  that 
this is a security issue that is beyond just our individual victimiza-
tion of spies and those who would invade our homes, but it also has 
national  security  implications.  We  simply  have  to  work  on  how 
broad  it  is,  so  that  we  don’t  stifle  the  future,  but  that  we  protect 
people presently in our country as well. 

Senator Burns. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:20 Jun 14, 2006 Jkt 027822 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

3

STATEMENT OF HON. CONRAD BURNS,

U.S. SENATOR FROM MONTANA 

Senator  BURNS.  Thank  you  very  much.  And  thank  you  Mr. 
Chairman, for taking the leadership on this hearing today. We had 
a hearing before, and with most of that hearing was with the folks 
in  the  industry  and  consumer  groups.  Today  I  think  we’ll  get  a 
chance to hear from the Federal Trade Commission, which is—and 
will  continue  to  have,  an  important  role  in  anti-spyware  enforce-
ment  actions.  So  the  two  hearings  are  complementary  in  that  re-
spect,  and  will  help  us  learn  more  about  the  problem  of  spyware. 
Also  just  a  note,  our  technologies  continue  to  grow,  and  the  use 
of  those  technologies  goes  into  many  fields,  especially  in  the  area 
of  electronic  information  and  communications,  with  Voice  over  IP 
prominent now in the marketplace, national emergency numbers of 
911  and  how  we  apply  those  and  protect  those  and  the  safety  of 
911  in  emergency  conditions  are  challenges  that  continue  to  grow 
for  safety  and  security.  And  we  must  never  lose  sight  of  that.  So 
we will continue to have problems in those areas. 

Spyware, as you know, is an increasingly dangerous threat to our 
everyday  activities  in  cyberspace.  As  was  the  case  with  spam  sev-
eral  years  ago,  I  believe  the  solution  lies  in  the  right  mix  of  tech-
nical  solutions  and  tougher  legislation.  Both  will  be  necessary  to 
make a meaningful dent in the quantity and the types of malicious 
code that gets downloaded into the private computers of businesses 
and citizens without their consent. 

We  also  have  to  be  careful  not  to  throw  out  the  baby  with  the 
bathwater,  by  making  many  ordinary  and  positive  types  of  online 
business  practices  illegal.  The  area  of  adware  in  particular  is  an 
important  gray  area  to  keep  an  eye  on:  how  exactly  online  adver-
tisements are served up to users, and what kind of consent is most 
appropriate.  Most  adware  models  are  good  for  cyberspace,  because 
it is important to have a robust and responsive advertising compo-
nent for online businesses, but when it comes to installing software 
on  private  computers,  we  have  to  make  sure  we  don’t  allow  some 
of the more unscrupulous players out there to spoil the field for all 
the  good  actors  that  are  just  trying  to  make  cyberspace  more  effi-
cient. 

So  I  thank  the  Chairman  of  the  FTC  for  coming  up  today,  and 
I  look  forward  to  how  she  responds  to  questions,  and  the  informa-
tion she can share with us, and again to Senator Smith for setting 
up  today’s  hearing,  because  I  think  it’s  very  appropriate,  and  it  is 
something  that  we  have  to  get  these  bills  moving  and  we  need 
something  passed  and  on  the  President’s  desk  before  Christmas-
time. 

Senator SMITH. Thank you Senator Burns. 
Senator Allen. 

STATEMENT OF HON. GEORGE ALLEN,

U.S. SENATOR FROM VIRGINIA 

Senator  ALLEN.  Thank  you  Mr.  Chairman,  I  especially  want  to 
thank  you  for  calling  today’s  hearing,  and  I  thank  Chairman 
Majoras for being with us today. 

And  I  enjoyed  listening  to  my  colleagues,  and  maybe  there  will 
be  a  way  that  we  can  work  together  on  this  issue.  Because  the 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:20 Jun 14, 2006 Jkt 027822 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

4

spyware  issue  is  one  of  great  importance.  Just  to  set  the  param-
eters  here  of  what  kind  of  a  problem  we  have—according  to  the 
Pew Internet and American Life Project study in July of this year, 
in  2005  approximately  59  million  American  adults,  nearly  half  of 
the Internet users, 43 percent say they have had spyware on their 
home computer. 

It’s irritating. It is a dangerous approach which is negatively im-
pacting consumers confidence and harming the Internet as a viable 
mode,  or  medium  for  communications  and  also  electronic  com-
merce. And none of us here want to allow this to continue. 

All  of  us  can  agree  that  under  no  circumstance  is  it  acceptable 
to deceptively monitor a consumer’s activities online. Unfortunately 
we  do  not  all  agree  on  how  best  to  deal  with  this  problem  legisla-
tively.  Now  in  examining  this  offensive  spyware  issue,  which 
causes  so  much  aggravation  and  degrades  computer  performance, 
we need to encourage to the greatest extent possible, market driven 
technologies solutions, as well as strengthen the enforcement of ex-
isting  laws.  In  my  view,  every  legitimate  business  associated  with 
the Internet has a very important interest in eliminating spyware. 
A  recent  Federal  Trade  Commission  report  suggested  that  the 
rapid  technology  advancements,  and  this  is  consistent  with  your 
comments, Mr. Chairman, that there are a lot of advances in tech-
nologies  to  combat  spyware  such  as  firewalls,  filters,  anti-spyware 
tools and improved Internet browsers and operating systems are all 
the  time  providing  easy  and  more  affordable  protections  to  con-
sumers, whether at their homes or at their place of business. 

I  think  that  the  Internet’s  viability  is  being  challenged  by  this 
deceptive spyware though, and because of these fraudulent and de-
ceptive installations of spyware programs being a concern, it is not 
a concern though whether this is legal or not; this already is illegal 
under Federal law, it’s a violation of Federal law. Such as the Fed-
eral  Trade  Commission  Act,  and  the  Computer  Fraud  and  Abuse 
Act. 

So  I  think  Congress  needs  to  focus  its  efforts  on  adequate  re-
sources  and  penalties  to  combat  this  criminal  activity.  I’ve  deter-
mined that Federal officials, and we’ll hear from the Chairman, be-
lieve  that  they  already  have  adequate  authority  under  existing 
statutes  to  prosecute  spyware  purveyors.  Law  enforcement  is  not 
stymied  by  the  lack  of  Federal  jurisdiction  but  rather  a  lack  of 
overall resources. That’s why my legislation, S. 1004 with the sup-
port  of  you  Mr.  Chairman,  Senators  Smith,  Sununu,  Ensign,  and 
Enzi, provides Federal law enforcement officials with the resources 
and  the  tool  necessary  to  increase  the  breadth  and  the  strength  of 
anti-spyware enforcement efforts. 

Our  legislation  strikes  a  careful  balance  that  you  talked  about 
Mr.  Chairman,  between  pursuing  illegal  wrongful  behavior  while 
not  stifling  or  limiting  technology,  innovation  or  legitimate  online 
transactions. 

Specifically,  since  spyware  violators  are  not  limited  to  state  or 
national  borders  to  perpetrate  their  illegal  activity,  our  legislation 
sets a national standard. It doesn’t matter what state you’re in, or 
territory  of  the  United  States.  There  ought  to  be  that  national 
standard  for  the  unfair  and  deceptive  practices  associated  with 
spyware.  Additionally,  our  legislation  provides  the  FTC  with  the 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:20 Jun 14, 2006 Jkt 027822 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

5

authority to share and coordinate information with foreign law en-
forcement officials to improve their ability to bring cases and pros-
ecute  international  spyware  purveyors,  your  separate  bill,  Mr. 
Chairman,  this  is  just  a  component  of  our  bill,  but  yours  covers  it 
as well. 

But lastly, our legislation addresses the most egregious activities 
and  wrongful  behavior  conducted  via  spyware,  by  significantly  in-
creasing  civil  and  criminal  penalties  including  disgorgement.  We 
need to ensure that law enforcement officials can get after the ille-
gal  gains  of  these  criminals.  You  can  fine  them,  but  if  they  have 
any  assets  that  are  traceable  to  this  illegal  activity  it  is  an  enter-
prise  on  their  part,  and  they’re  selling  this  information.  And  we 
ought  to  get  after  those  ill  gotten  gains.  I  don’t  care  what  it  is, 
bank  accounts,  yachts,  art  objects,  whatever  they’ve  bought,  we 
need to get after these enterprises as well as the criminal and civil 
fines. 

I  believe  again,  that  we  need  to  find  some  market  driven  solu-
tions,  technology  solutions  that  will  ultimately  solve  this  problem. 
I  want  to  help  the  FTC  have  the  resources  they  need  to  get  after 
this  criminal  and  illegal  behavior,  and  I  look  forward  Mr.  Chair-
man  to  hearing  from  the  Chairman  of  the  FTC,  but  most  impor-
tantly  if  there  is  a  way,  and  I’m  not  sure  there  is,  there  are  some 
just fundamental differences, but we need to act. 

The Senate a lot of the times is the last to act, but I think there’s 
enough will here that I hope working with my good friend Senator 
Burns  that  we  can  hopefully  find  a  common  ground  to  have  the 
Federal Government help the FTC do its job, set a national stand-
ard and get you the resources to get after this illegal behavior. 

And I thank you again Mr. Chairman. 
Senator  SMITH.  Thank  you  very  much  Senator  Allen.  Madam 
Chairman,  the  mike  is  yours,  we  look  forward  to  your  testimony. 

STATEMENT OF HON. DEBORAH P. MAJORAS, CHAIRMAN, 

FEDERAL TRADE COMMISSION 

Ms.  MAJORAS.  Thank  you  very  much  Mr.  Chairman,  and  Mem-

bers of the Subcommittee, and good afternoon. 

The  Federal  Trade  Commission  appreciates  this  opportunity  to 
provide  the  Commission’s  views  on  the  serious  problems  that 
spyware  is  causing  to  consumers  and  the  steps  that  the  FTC  has 
taken to address the problem. 

Although  the  views  expressed  in  the  written  testimony  present 
the  views  expressed  of  the  Commission,  my  oral  presentation  and 
responses  to  questions  are  my  own,  and  may  not  necessarily  rep-
resent the views of the Commission. 

As  the  Subcommittee  is  aware,  the  Commission  has  a  broad 
mandate  to  prohibit  unfair  competition,  and  unfair  or  deceptive 
practices  in  the  marketplace.  We  have  actively  used  this  authority 
to  address  consumer  problems  on  the  Internet,  including  Internet 
fraud, privacy, spam and spyware. 

The  term  spyware  can  be  difficult  to  define.  It  is  ordinarily 
thought of as including programs such as keyloggers, that can copy 
information  from  consumers’  computers,  as  well  as  some  types  of 
adware, software that monitors computers’ surfing habits and then 
serves up pop-up advertisements. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:20 Jun 14, 2006 Jkt 027822 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

6

At  the  FTC,  our  focus  is  on  spyware  and  other  malware  that  is 
downloaded  without  authorization,  and  causes  consumers  harm. 
The  consumer  harm  from  spyware  can  range  from  the  capture  of 
sensitive personal information to degradation of computer perform-
ance, to the nuisance and distraction of popup ads. 

To  address  spyware,  we  implemented  an  active  program,  com-
bining  law  enforcement  and  consumer  education  supplemented  by 
our research. Much of the harmful conduct associated with spyware 
is  already  illegal.  Indeed  the  FTC  has  brought  several  cases,  and 
today  is  announcing  it  has  filed  another  action,  FTC  versus  Odys-
seus  Marketing.  In  this  case,  we  filed  a  complaint  in  Federal  Dis-
trict Court in New Hampshire against Odysseus Marketing and its 
principal,  Walter  Rines,  charging  them  with  secretly  installing 
spyware on consumers’ computers. 

Our  complaint  alleges  that  the  defendants  deceptively  market 
and  distribute  a  bogus  program  called  Kazanon,  which  defendants 
claim  will  make  users  anonymous  when  using  peer-to-peer  file-
sharing programs. 

Not only does Kazanon not work as promised, which itself a vio-
lation  of  the  FTC  Act,  but  it  also  automatically  installs  a  spyware 
program  called  Clientman  on  the  users’  computer.  Clientman  in 
turn  automatically  installs  numerous  adware  and  other  programs 
on behalf of others. And this spyware, among other things, replaces 
or  reformats  Internet  search  engine  results,  generates  pop-up  ads, 
and  captures  and  transmits  information  which  may  include  per-
sonal information. 

Our  complaint  alleges  that  defendants  have  failed  to  disclose 
adequately that downloading Kazanon will install this spyware. In 
fact,  the  only  place  that  Clientman’s  virtual  takeover  of  the  host 
computer  is  disclosed  is  in  the  end  user  license  agreement,  or  as 
we call it the EULA. 

Consumers,  however,  do  not  need  to  view  the  EULA  in  order  to 
download  Kazanon,  and  even  if  they  did  they  would  have  to  wade 
through five paragraphs of dense text before they reached informa-
tion even approaching the disclosure. 

We  further  allege  that  once  Clientman  is  installed,  consumers 
cannot  remove  Kazanon  and  Clientman  from  their  computers 
through reasonable means. Programs do not appear on the desktop 
or in the start menu, and because they avoid being detected by the 
Microsoft  Windows  operating  system,  consumers  cannot  use 
Microsoft’s default uninstall utilities to remove them. 

And  defendants  claim  to  provide  an  uninstall  tool,  but  it  doesn’t 
work.  In  fact,  we  allege  in  the  complaint  that  if  you  activate  de-
fendants’  uninstall  tool,  typically  that  will  result  in  having  addi-
tional files being added to your computer. 

Now  as  we  bring  each  spyware  case,  we  learn  more  about  the 
technology  and  tricks  in  the  industry  and  we  increase  our  ability 
to bring future cases. We’ve made spyware investigations and pros-
ecutions an enforcement priority and we will file more law enforce-
ment  actions.  There’s  no  question  however  that  attacking  spyware 
is challenging. 

Given  its  surreptitious  nature,  it  is  often  difficult  to  ascertain 
from  whom,  from  where,  and  how  spyware  is  disseminated.  Many 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:20 Jun 14, 2006 Jkt 027822 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

7

who  distribute  spyware  are  adept  at  hiding,  covering  their  tracks, 
and evading responsibility. 

Further,  consumer  complaints  about  spyware  are  less  likely  to 
lead  us  directly  to  law  enforcement  targets  than  some  other  com-
plaints. Consumers often do not know from where the spyware has 
come,  or  even  that  it  was  spyware  that  caused  the  problems  to 
their computers in the first place. 

There are five additional points that the Commission believes are 
important  to  our  continuing  efforts  to  combat  the  dissemination  of 
spyware. 

First, many spyware distributors and other Internet scam artists 
are  located  abroad,  or  mask  their  location  by  using  foreign  inter-
mediaries  to  peddle  their  scams.  A  majority  of  spyware  programs 
distributed  to  the  United  States  consumers  come  from  foreign  dis-
tributors. In the FTC’s investigations, staff finds that regardless of 
where  the  spyware  distributors  are  physically  located  they  are 
often  using  foreign  Internet  service  providers,  or  web  hosting  com-
panies, or domain registrars, which makes it difficult to crack down 
on who’s ultimately responsible. 

Our  ability  to  pursue  distributors  of  spyware,  and  spam  and 
other  Internet  threats  would  be  significantly  improved  if  Congress 
were  pass  the  U.S.  SAFE  WEB  Act.  And  Chairman  Smith,  we 
thank you for introducing S. 1608 which would give us that needed 
authority. 

Second, coordinated effort at the Federal and State level is essen-
tial.  The  Commission  is  continuing  to  cooperate  with  Federal  and 
state  partners,  which  now  are  bringing  law  enforcement  actions 
against spyware distributors. At the Federal level, the Department 
of  Justice  is  able  to  prosecute  criminally  those  who  distribute 
spyware  in  certain  circumstances.  And  at  the  State  level,  state  at-
torneys general are bringing civil law enforcement actions and both 
are critical complements to the FTC’s actions. 

Third, an educated consumer is perhaps the best defense against 
online  fraud  and  spyware.  Over  the  last  few  months  the  FTC  has 
taken  a  broader  look  at  its  educational  materials  and  tactics  re-
lated  to  cyber  security,  online  privacy,  and  Internet  fraud,  and 
we’ve updated our messages and outreach strategies to better edu-
cate consumers about these important issues. 

Just last week the Commission launched a new consumer ed ini-
tiative, OnGuard Online. It has general information on online safe-
ty,  as  well  as  sections  with  specific  information  on  a  range  of  top-
ics,  including  spyware,  and  with  the  Chairman’s  indulgence  in  a 
few  moments  we’ll  give  you  a  quick  demonstration  of  this  new 
website. 

Fourth,  the  Commission  believes  that  legislation  granting  the 
Commission  authority  to  seek  civil  penalties  against  spyware  dis-
tributors  would  be  useful  in  deterring  the  dissemination  of 
spyware.  The  Commission  has  the  authority,  as  Senator  Allen  re-
ferred,  to  file  actions  against  those  engaged  in  conduct  in  Federal 
Court, and we have the authority to obtain injunctive relief, includ-
ing  monetary  relief 
form  of  consumer  redress,  or 
disgorgement of ill gotten profits. 

But in some instances it may be difficult for us to prove the sort 
of  financial  harm  that  we  would  need  to  in  order  to  get  that  sort 

in  the 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:20 Jun 14, 2006 Jkt 027822 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

8

of  redress.  A  civil  penalty  is  often  then  the  most  appropriate  rem-
edy in those cases, and we believe it could serve as a strong deter-
rent as well. 

And  finally,  as  with  any  technology  problem,  the  most  com-
prehensive response may have to come from new technology. Tech-
nology is what got us here, and technology should be able to bring 
us  out  eventually.  As  in  other  areas  like  spam  and  data  security, 
it is essential that industry continue to develop technology to assist 
their own customers in combating the threats of spyware and other 
malware. 

We  know  that  ISPs  and  other  industry  members  are  developing 
responses to consumer concerns about spyware and we also are ap-
preciative that they have provided the Commission with important 
assistance in our investigations. 

In conclusion, Mr. Chairman, I assure you that the FTC will con-
tinue  to  aggressively  attack  spyware  with  law  enforcement  actions 
and  with  innovative  consumer  education.  And  we  look  forward  to 
working with the Committee on the problem of spyware. 

Now I look forward to answering any questions you have, but be-
fore we begin, if it’s still all right with you, Mr. Chairman, I’d like 
to  ask  Nat  Wood,  who’s  our  Assistant  Director  for  Consumer  and 
Business  Education,  to  just  give  you  a  brief  demonstration  of  our 
new  OnGuardOnline.gov  website,  particularly  as  it  relates  to 
spyware. 

All  right.  What  you’re  seeing  before  you  is  the  result  of  team 
work. The FTC, a number of other Federal agencies, and the tech-
nology  community  have  teamed  up  to  create  OnGuardOnline.gov, 
which  is  a  new  site  to  help  computer  users  guard  against  Internet 
fraud,  secure  their  computers  and  protect  their  personal  informa-
tion.  We’re  encouraging  companies  and  other  organizations  to  help 
fight spyware, spam, identity theft and the like, by sharing the tips 
on  this  website  with  their  employees,  their  customers,  members 
and constituents. 

Interestingly,  this  website  is  branded  independently  of  the  FTC. 
We are not making it FTC materials, because we want any organi-
zation  with  an  interest,  whether  it’s  government,  business,  con-
sumer  groups,  whatever,  to  take  this,  make  it  their  own  and  dis-
tribute  it  widely  across  our  country.  Indeed,  we  now  have  a  lot  of 
interest  that’s  coming  from  other  organizations  around  the  world 
who would like to be able to use these materials. 

So  just  quickly  looking  at  the  home  page,  probably  the  most  im-
portant  part  of  this  is  the  seven  practices  for  safer  computing. 
These are practices that we want consumers to be using regardless 
of  what  they’re  doing  online.  These  are  general  tips.  The  site  also 
contains  a  link  on  which  consumers  can  click  if  they  want  to  re-
ceive free e-mail alerts from the Department of Homeland Security 
on various threats to the online world. 

Then we have the ‘‘Learn About’’ section, in which consumers can 
click  on  various  modules  to  learn  about  different  threats  and  the 
like,  so  there  you  see  we  clicked  on  identity  theft,  there’s  one  on 
phishing,  we’ve  done  this  in  a  flexible  way,  so  that  as  new  threats 
develop  we  can  add  them  to  the  website.  And  then  we  have  an 
‘‘About  Us’’  page,  which  if  you  click  on  that  gives  you,  gives  the 
consumer,  a  description  of  all  of  the  various  Federal  agencies  and 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:20 Jun 14, 2006 Jkt 027822 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

9

other  organizations  that  they  can  turn  to  for  help  with  respect  to 
their online problems. So going back to the modules, we’ll just turn 
quickly  to  the  spyware  section,  and  what  you  can  see  if  you  click 
on  this  section,  is  first  and  foremost  you  get  a  quick  tips  section, 
which  tells  consumers  very  quickly  what  they  should  do,  then 
below  that  we  have  a  much  longer  article,  so  that  if  consumers 
want to read further about spyware, its dangers and what they can 
do about it, they have that there. 

We  have  a  place  for  links  and  resources  so  that  they  can  link  to 
additional  anti-spyware  resources,  including  if  they  want  to  learn 
about  what  anti-spyware  tools  are  available.  And  then  we  have  a 
section  that  tells  the  consumer  where  to  report  spyware  problems 
and,  not  surprisingly,  the  FTC  is  listed  there.  Then  because  we 
know  and  experts  have  told  us,  and  we  did  a  lot  of  consumer  test-
ing, and the like, we know the folks who spend a lot of time online 
like  to  be  interactive  online,  so  if  they  think  they’re  experts  we 
have a quiz. 

So you click on this to begin the quiz. You get a little bit of infor-
mation  about  spyware  and  then  the  quiz  goes  on  to  ask  various 
questions  to  educate  the  consumers.  So  this  one  says  a  pop-up  ad 
appears on your computer screen offering an anti-spyware product, 
‘‘what’s  your  best  course  of  action? ’’  And  then  gives  various  an-
swers,  I  would  click  on  ‘‘C’’  which  says  ‘‘close  the  window  if  you 
want spyware protection software, get it from a provider you know 
and  trust.’’  And  that  would  be—I  would  then  hear,  ‘‘Excellent 
choice. The scammers will have to get up pretty early in the morn-
ing  to  pull  one  over  on  you,’’  and  the  quiz  goes  on.  And  obviously 
if you get the answer wrong we explain why, in fact that would be 
wrong, and give the better course. 

So this is—we will have quizzes on all of the modules very soon, 
and I’m also pleased to report that this is also available in Spanish. 

So thank you very much Mr. Chairman. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Majoras follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DEBORAH P. MAJORAS, CHAIRMAN,

FEDERAL TRADE COMMISSION 

I. Introduction 

Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  the  Federal  Trade  Commission 
(‘‘Commission’’  or  ‘‘FTC’’)  appreciates  this  opportunity  to  provide  the  Commission’s 
views on ‘‘spyware.’’ 1 Spyware is a serious and growing problem that is causing sub-
stantial harm to consumers and to the Internet as a medium of communication and 
commerce. Preventing spyware that causes such harms is a priority for the Commis-
sion.  We  welcome  this  chance  to  describe  what  the  FTC  is  doing  to  try  to  protect 
consumers from these harms. 

The  Commission  has  a  broad  mandate  to  prevent  unfair  competition  and  unfair 
or  deceptive  acts  or  practices  in  the  marketplace.  Section  5  of  the  Federal  Trade 
Commission  Act  gives  the  agency  the  authority  to  challenge  acts  and  practices  in 
or affecting commerce that are unfair or deceptive. 2 The FTC’s law enforcement ac-
tivities against unfair or deceptive acts and practices are generally designed to pro-
mote  informed  consumer  choice,  because  an  informed  consumer  is  an  empowered 
consumer. 

Spyware and other ‘‘malware’’ that is downloaded without authorization can cause 
a  range  of  problems  for  computer  users,  from  nuisance  adware  that  delivers  pop-

1 The written statement presents the views of the Federal Trade Commission. Oral statements 
and  responses  to  questions  reflect  the  views  of  the  speaker  and  do  not  necessarily  reflect  the 
views of the Commission or any other Commissioner. 

2 15 U.S.C. § 45. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:20 Jun 14, 2006 Jkt 027822 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

10

up ads, to software that causes sluggish computer performance, to keystroke loggers 
that  capture  sensitive  information.  As  described  below,  the  Commission  has  an  ac-
tive  program  to  address  concerns  about  spyware  and  other  malware,  including  re-
search, law enforcement and consumer education. In the past year, the Commission 
has  initiated  five  law  enforcement  actions  addressing  spyware  and  malware,  and 
has ongoing investigations. Moreover, as in other areas such as spam and data secu-
rity,  we  believe  that  it  is  essential  that  industry  continue  to  develop  technology  to 
assist its customers in combatting spyware. 
II. Spyware Law Enforcement 

One of the FTC’s first steps in responding to the spyware problem was to educate 
ourselves  in  order  to  develop,  implement,  and  advocate  effective  policies  to  respond 
to  it.  In  2004,  the  FTC  sponsored  a  public  workshop  entitled  ‘‘Monitoring  Software 
on  Your  PC:  Spyware,  Adware,  and  Other  Software.’’  The  agency  received  almost 
800  comments  in  connection  with  the  workshop,  and  34  representatives  from  the 
computer  and  software  industries,  trade  associations,  consumer  advocacy  groups 
and  various  governmental  entities  participated  as  panelists.  In  March  2005,  the 
FTC  released  a  staff  report  based  on  the  information  received  in  connection  with 
the  workshop. 3 Notwithstanding  significant  challenges  in  defining  ‘‘spyware,’’ 4 the 
staff  report  recommended  that  the  government  should:  (1)  increase,  using  existing 
laws,  criminal  and  civil  prosecution  of  those  who  distribute  spyware;  and  (2)  in-
crease  efforts  to  educate  consumers  about  the  risks  of  spyware.  The  Commission  is 
pleased  to  be  able  to  describe  today  what  we  are  doing  to  implement  these  rec-
ommendations. 

The  Commission’s  spyware  law  enforcement  strategy  focuses  on  three  key  ques-
tions. First, were consumers aware of the installation of the software on their com-
puters?  Second,  what  harm  did  the  installation  of  the  software  cause?  Third,  how 
difficult  was  it  for  consumers  to  uninstall  the  software  after  it  had  been  installed? 
A. Did Consumers Know? 

A  common  problem  with  spyware  is  that  it  is  installed  on  consumers’  computers 
without  their  knowledge.  Some  spyware  distributors  use  so-called 
‘‘drive-by’’ 
downloads  to  install  their  software  on  computers  without  even  any  pretense  of  ob-
taining consent. In FTC v. Seismic Entertainment, 5 for example, the Commission al-
leged  that  the  defendants  exploited  a  known  vulnerability  in  the  Internet  Explorer 
web browser to download spyware to users’ computers without their knowledge. The 
FTC  alleged  that  this  was  an  unfair  act  or  practice  in  violation  of  Section  5  of  the 
FTC Act, and a Federal district court entered a preliminary injunction that prohib-
ited the defendants from using this method to distribute their software. 

In other instances, software distributors may violate Section 5 of the FTC Act by 
failing to disclose clearly and conspicuously to consumers the software that is being 
installed.  In  FTC  v.  Odysseus  Marketing,  Inc., 6 the  defendants  offered  consumers 
a  free  software  program  that  purported  to  make  the  consumers  anonymous  when 
using peer-to-peer file sharing programs. The Commission alleged, however, the dis-
tributors  failed  to  disclose  to  consumers  that  this  program,  in  turn,  would  install 
other,  harmful  software  on  their  computers.  The  Commission  recently  filed  a  com-
plaint  in  Federal  court  alleging  that  this  failure  to  disclose  was  deceptive  in  viola-
tion  of  Section  5  of  the  FTC  Act,  and  we  are  awaiting  a  ruling  on  our  motion  for 
a temporary restraining order. Similarly, in the Advertising.com, Inc. case, 7 the re-
spondents allegedly offered free security software, but failed to clearly and conspicu-

3 The  workshop  agenda,  transcript,  panelist  presentations,  and  public  comments  received  by 
the  Commission  are  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/bcp/workshops/spyware/index.htm.  The 
FTC Staff Report, Monitoring Software on Your PC: Spyware, Adware, and Other Software, re-
leased Mar. 2005, is available at http://www.ftc.gov/os/2005/03/050307spywarerpt.pdf.

4 At the FTC workshop, there was ‘‘broad agreement that spyware should be defined to include 
software installed without adequate consent from the user,’’ yet there remained ‘‘substantial dif-
ferences  of  opinion  as  to  what  distributors  must  do  to  obtain  such  consent.’’  See  FTC  Staff  Re-
port, supra note 3, at 4–5. In addition, there was agreement that ‘‘to avoid inadvertently includ-
ing  software  that  is  benign  or  beneficial,  the  term  spyware  should  be  limited  to  software  that 
causes  some  harm  to  consumers,’’  although  there  were  ‘‘substantial  differences  of  opinion  as  to 
when  software  has  caused  the  type  and  magnitude  of  harm  to  warrant  being  treated  as 
spyware.’’  Id.  The  FTC  staff  therefore  concluded  that  ‘‘these  fundamental  issues  of  consent  and 
harm  need  to  be  resolved  before  any  common  definition  of  spyware  can  be  developed.’’  Id.  at 
5. 

5 FTC  v.  Seismic  Entertainment,  Inc.,  No.  04–377–JD,  2004  U.S.  Dist.  LEXIS  22788  (D.N.H. 

Oct. 21, 2004). 

6 FTC v. Odysseus Marketing, Inc., No. 05–CV–330 (D.N.H. filed Sept. 21, 2005). 
7 In  the  Matter  of  Advertising.com,  FTC  File  No.  042  3196  (filed  Sept.  12,  2005),  available  at 

http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0423196/0423196.htm. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:20 Jun 14, 2006 Jkt 027822 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

11

ously  disclose  to  consumers  that  bundled  with  it  was  software  that  traced  con-
sumers’  Internet  browsing  and  force-fed  them  pop-up  advertising.  The  Commission 
recently issued a final consent order to resolve administrative complaint allegations 
that  this  failure  to  disclose  was  deceptive  in  violation  of  Section  5  of  the  FTC  Act. 
The  Commission’s  spyware  law  enforcement  actions  reaffirm  the  principle  that 
consumers  have  the  right  to  decide  whether  to  install  new  software  on  their  com-
puters.  Acts  and  practices  that  undermine  their  ability  to  make  this  choice  will  be 
vigorously prosecuted. 
B. Substantial Harm to Consumers 

As the Agency learned at the workshop, and through our enforcement actions and 
subsequent investigations, spyware can cause a broad range of injury to consumers. 
The harm from spyware may vary significantly in both type and severity. 

The allegations in the Seismic case describe a prime example of software causing 
several types of serious harm to consumers. The software allegedly changed the con-
sumer’s  browser  home  page  and  default  search  engine,  displayed  an  incessant 
stream  of  pop-up  ads,  and  caused  the  user’s  computer  to  malfunction,  slow  down, 
or crash. But perhaps the most serious harm alleged was that the spyware secretly 
installed  a  number  of  additional  software  programs,  including  programs  that  could 
monitor  Internet  activity  and  capture  personal  information  entered  into  online 
forms. 

Another example of serious harm to consumers allegedly caused by spyware arose 
in the Odysseus case. According to the Commission’s complaint, the defendants sur-
reptitiously install a spyware program called ‘‘Clientman ‘’ on the computers of con-
sumers. Clientman, in turn, installs a number of adware and other programs. It also 
replaces or reformats Internet search engine results, generates pop-up ads, and cap-
tures and transmits information, which may include personal information. 

In  the  Advertising.com  case,  the  Commission  alleged  that  software  bundled  with 
free security software collected information about consumers, including the websites 
they  visited,  and  then  was  used  to  send  a  substantial  number  of  pop-up  ads.  Al-
though  the  harm  to  an  individual  consumer  from  receiving  such  pop-ups  ads  may 
be  less  egregious  than  the  harm  in  other  FTC  spyware  cases  to  date,  the  harm  to 
consumers in the aggregate from these pop-up ads was sufficient to warrant law en-
forcement  action.  The  Commission  alleged  a  violation  of  Section  5  of  the  FTC  Act 
because the presence of bundled adware that collected information about consumers’ 
computer  use  and  led  to  numerous  pop-up  ads  clearly  would  have  been  material  to 
consumers in determining whether to install the free security software. 

As stated in the FTC staff spyware report, it is the combination of lack of knowl-
edge  and  consumer  harm  that  makes  certain  installation  of  software  illegal  under 
the FTC Act. 8 
C. Uninstalling and Deleting Spyware Problems 

As described above, spyware often is installed without consumers’ knowledge and 
causes  consumers  substantial  harm.  This  type  of  installation  should  not  occur,  but 
once it has, consumers should be able to uninstall or disable such software. Unfortu-
nately,  the  FTC’s  law  enforcement  experience  and  research  shows  that  some  soft-
ware  distributors  take  improper  advantage  of  consumers’  concerns  about  spyware 
and  market  bogus  anti-spyware  tools.  In  addition,  in  the  FTC’s  experience,  some 
spyware programs are difficult to identify and uninstall or disable. 

Many  consumers  who  want  to  determine  whether  there  is  spyware  on  their  per-
sonal  computers  acquire  and  run  an  anti-spyware  program.  An  anti-spyware  pro-
gram usually identifies each software program that it concludes is spyware and then 
gives  the  consumer  the  option  of  deleting  it.  Some  software  distributors,  however, 
take  advantage  of  consumers  looking  for  anti-spyware  products  by  falsely  rep-
resenting  to  consumers  that  spyware  resides  on  their  computers  and  making  false 
claims  about  the  ability  of  their  products  to  remove  spyware.  In  two  recent  cases, 
FTC  v.  MaxTheater  and  FTC  v.  Trustsoft, 9 the  FTC  alleged  that  the  defendants 
made  false  claims  to  consumers  about  the  existence  of  spyware  on  their  machines. 
According  to  the  FTC’s  complaint,  the  defendants  then  used  these  false  claims  to 
convince  consumers  to  conduct  free  ‘‘scans’’  of  their  computers.  These  scans  identi-
fied innocuous software as spyware, helping to persuade consumers to purchase de-
fendants’ spyware removal products at a cost of between $30 and $40. Moreover, the 
FTC  alleged,  the  defendants  claimed  their  spyware  removal  products  could  effec-

8 See generally, FTC Staff Report, supra note 3, at 20–21. 
9 FTC v. MaxTheater, Inc., No. 05–CV–0069 (E.D. Wa. filed Mar. 7, 2005), available at http:/
/www.ftc.gov/opa/2005/03/maxtheater.htm;  FTC  v.  Trustsoft,  Inc.,  No.  H–05–1905  (S.D.Tex. 
filed May 31, 2005), available at http://www.ftc.gov/opa/2005/06/trustsoft.htm.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:20 Jun 14, 2006 Jkt 027822 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

12

tively  uninstall  many  different  types  of  known  spyware  programs,  but  the  defend-
ants’  products  did  not  perform  as  promised.  The  Commission  filed  actions  alleging 
that  the  perpetrators  of  these  scams  violated  Section  5  of  the  FTC  Act,  and  the 
courts  have  entered  preliminary  injunctions  in  both  cases  that  prohibit  the  claims. 
Software  falsely  billed  as  an  anti-spyware  product  certainly  can  make  it  difficult 
for  consumers  to  identify  and  uninstall  or  disable  spyware  programs.  Furthermore, 
even if consumers can identify spyware programs, some of them are particularly dif-
ficult  to  remove  or  disable.  In  the  Odysseus  case,  the  complaint  alleged  that  con-
sumers  could  not  uninstall  the  software  through  any  reasonable  means,  such  as  by 
using the standard ‘‘Add/Remove’’ program on the Microsoft Windows operating sys-
tem.  According  to  the  Commission’s  complaint,  although  the  defendants  purport  to 
provide instructions for uninstalling the program, those instructions are not only ex-
tremely  difficult  for  consumers  to  find,  they  simply  do  not  work.  The  complaint  al-
leged that the defendants’ failure to provide users with a reasonable means to locate 
and remove the program is an unfair act or practice in violation of Section 5 of the 
FTC Act. 

The  FTC’s  law  enforcement  actions  under  Section  5  of  the  FTC  Act  have  focused 
on preserving consumers’ ability to decide what software programs to install and re-
tain  on  their  computers,  and  preventing  substantial  harm  from  software  programs 
installed or remaining against the consumers’ wishes. 
III. Additional Steps to Address Spyware 

Given  the  prevalence  of  spyware  and  the  consumer  harm  it  inflicts,  the  FTC  has 
made spyware investigations and prosecutions an enforcement priority, and we will 
continue to file law enforcement actions against those who distribute spyware in vio-
lation  of  the  FTC  Act.  The  Commission  would  like  to  emphasize  four  additional 
measures  that  it  believes  would  enhance  its  efforts  to  combat  the  dissemination  of 
spyware. 

First,  the  FTC  supports  legislation  that  would  enhance  its  ability  to  investigate 
and prosecute spyware distributors that are located abroad or who try to mask their 
location  by  using  foreign  intermediaries  to  peddle  their  scams.  Webroot,  a  well-
known  anti-spyware  product  distributor,  recently  reported  that  a  majority  of 
spyware  programs  distributed  to  United  States  consumers  come  from  foreign  dis-
tributors. 10 In  the  FTC’s  investigations,  staff  finds  that,  regardless  of  where 
spyware  distributors  are  physically  located,  they  often  use  foreign  Internet  service 
providers,  web  hosting  companies,  and  domain  registrars  to  create  their  websites, 
so that it is difficult for the agency to track down who is ultimately responsible. 

The  FTC’s  ability  to  pursue  distributors  of  spyware,  spam,  and  other  Internet 
threats  to  consumers  would  be  significantly  improved  if  the  Congress  were  to  pass 
the  U.S.  SAFE  WEB  Act,  introduced  by  Chairman  Smith  in  the  Senate  as  S.  1608. 
The  Act  makes  it  easier  for  the  FTC  to  share  information  and  otherwise  cooperate 
with  foreign  law  enforcement  officials.  The  Internet  knows  no  boundaries,  and  it  is 
critical  to  improve  the  FTC’s  ability  to  work  with  the  officials  of  other  countries  to 
prevent  online  conduct  that  undermines  consumer  confidence  in  the  Internet  as  a 
medium of communication and commerce. 

Second,  the  Commission  will  continue  to  coordinate  with  its  Federal  and  state 
partners  who  are  starting  to  bring  their  own  law  enforcement  actions  against 
spyware  distributors  to  make  law  enforcement  as  effective  as  possible.  At  the  Fed-
eral  level,  the  Department  of  Justice  is  able  to  prosecute  criminally  those  who  dis-
tribute spyware in certain circumstances. In August 2005, for instance, the Depart-
ment announced the indictments of the creator and marketer of a spyware program 
called  ‘‘Loverspy  ‘’  and  four  others  who  used  the  program  to  break  into  computers 
and illegally intercept the electronic communications of others. 11 At the state level, 
state attorneys general are bringing civil law enforcement actions. Federal criminal 
and  state  law  enforcement  actions  are  a  critical  complement  to  the  FTC’s  law  en-
forcement actions. 

Third,  the  FTC  and  others  need  to  continue  to  play  an  active  role  in  educating 
consumers  about  the  risks  of  spyware  and  anti-spyware  tools.  The  FTC  has  issued 
a  Consumer  Alert  specifically  on  spyware,  as  well  as  four  other  Alerts  addressing 
other  online  security  issues  such  as  viruses  and  peer-to-peer  file  sharing.  The 
Spyware  Alert  lists  clues  that  indicate  spyware  may  have  been  installed  and  also 
discusses  measures  consumers  can  take  to  get  rid  of  spyware  or  to  reduce  their 

10 Webroot  Software,  Inc.,  State  of  Spyware  Q2  2005,  released  Aug.  2005,  at  26,  available  at 

http://www.webroot.com/land/sosreport.php.

11 Press  Release,  Department  of  Justice,  Office  of  the  United  States  Attorney,  Southern  Dis-
trict  of  California  Carol  C.  Lam,  News  Release  Summary  (Aug.  26,  2005),  available  at
http://www.usdoj.gov/usao/cas/pr/cas50826.1.pdf. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:20 Jun 14, 2006 Jkt 027822 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

13

chances  of  getting  spyware  in  the  first  place.  The  Spyware  Alert  has  been  accessed 
over  100,000  times  since  it  was  released  in  October  2004,  and  the  tips  it  includes 
have been repeated in dozens of print and broadcast media stories. 

And,  just  last  week,  the  Commission  launched  a  new  consumer  education  initia-
tive, OnGuard Online. Over the past few months, the FTC staff has taken a broader 
look  at  its  education  materials  and  tactics  related  to  cybersecurity,  online  privacy, 
and Internet fraud, and updated its messages and outreach strategies to better edu-
cate  computer  users  about  these  important  issues.  The  FTC’s  new  website—
OnGuardOnline.gov—has  general  information  on  online  safety,  as  well  as  sections 
with specific information on a range of topics, including spyware. This structure al-
lows  us  to  add  to  the  site  as  new  topics  arise.  The  spyware  module  includes  up-to-
date  information,  as  well  as  interactive  features  like  quizzes  and  videos.  The  FTC 
has  also  printed  a  million  copies  of  a  brochure,  ‘‘Stop  Think  Click:  7  Practices  for 
Safer  Computing,’’  with  information  on  spyware  and  other  computer  safety  topics. 
The site and the brochure have information on various technologies, but the agency 
is  also  emphasizing  behavioral  changes  that  computer  users  can  make  to  stay  safe 
online—for example ‘‘protect your personal information,’’ and ‘‘know who you’re deal-
ing  with.’’  By  taking  this  approach,  the  FTC  can  ensure  that  the  tips  remain  rel-
evant even as technology evolves. 

Our partners in the OnGuard Online initiative include: the Department of Home-
land  Security,  the  U.S.  Postal  Inspection  Service,  the  Department  of  Commerce, 
Technology Administration, the Internet Education Foundation, the National Cyber 
Security Alliance, the Anti-Phishing Working Group, TRUSTe, iSafe, AARP, the Na-
tional  Consumers  League,  and  the  Better  Business  Bureaus.  In  an  effort  to  ensure 
maximum  distribution  of  these  materials,  we  have  not  branded  them  as  our  own. 
Instead, we are encouraging any organization interested in computer security to link 
to OnGuardOnline.gov, distribute our free brochure, or reprint the OnGuard Online 
materials. 

Fourth and finally, the Commission believes that legislation granting the Commis-
sion  authority  to  seek  civil  penalties  against  spyware  distributors  may  be  useful  in 
deterring  the  dissemination  of  spyware.  As  described  above,  the  Commission  has 
challenged  conduct  related  to  spyware  dissemination  as  unfair  or  deceptive  acts  or 
practices  in  violation  of  Section  5  of  the  FTC  Act.  Under  Section  13(b)  of  the  FTC 
Act,  the  Commission  has  the  authority  to  file  actions  against  those  engaged  in  this 
conduct in Federal district court and obtain injunctive relief, including monetary re-
lief  in  the  form  of  consumer  redress  or  disgorgement  of  ill-gotten  profits.  However, 
it may be difficult in some instances for the FTC to prove the sort of financial harm 
to consumers needed to order consumer redress, or the ill-gotten gains necessary to 
order  disgorgement.  A  civil  penalty  is  often  the  most  appropriate  remedy  in  such 
cases, and serves as a strong deterrent. 
IV. Technological Solutions 

Reducing  the  problems  associated  with  spyware  and  other  malware  will  require 
the  efforts  of  government,  consumers,  and  industry  acting  both  individually  and  in 
concert.  As  in  other  high-technology  areas,  the  best  and  most  comprehensive  re-
sponses  to  misuse  of  technology  will  often  be  improved  technology.  At  this  time 
there  are  certain  technologies  consumers  can  use  to  help  protect  themselves,  but 
none  is  completely  effective  and  further  developments  are  needed  to  enhance  secu-
rity. 

The  primary  technological  tools  that  consumers  can  use  right  now  to  protect 
themselves  from  spyware  are  detection  programs.  These  programs  can  scan  con-
sumers’  computers,  inform  them  whether  there  is  spyware,  and  offer  them  the  op-
tion  of  disabling  it,  deleting  it,  or  leaving  it  alone.  To  be  effective,  however,  these 
programs must be updated on a regular basis. In addition, they are inherently vari-
able  depending  on  what  they  classify  as  ‘‘spyware.’’  Furthermore,  they  only  detect 
spyware once it has been installed; they do not prevent its installation. Some Inter-
net  service  providers  have  made  spyware  scanners  and  removers  available  to  their 
subscribers. Firewalls also provide some protection from spyware, but, like scanners, 
they  do  not  prevent  spyware  from  being  installed.  Rather,  they  alert  consumers  if 
installed spyware attempts to send out information it has collected. 

Other technological solutions at the browser and operating system level are being 
developed.  The  Commission’s  experience  in  other  technological  areas  suggests  that 
market forces will provide the high-tech industry with incentives to develop techno-
logical  solutions,  although  it  is  not  clear  exactly  what  that  technology  will  be  or 
when it will be available. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:20 Jun 14, 2006 Jkt 027822 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

14

V. Conclusion 

The FTC will continue to execute aggressive law enforcement and innovative con-
sumer  education  programs  in  the  spyware  arena.  The  FTC  thanks  this  Committee 
for  focusing  attention  on  this  important  issue,  and  for  giving  me  an  opportunity  to 
discuss  the  Commission’s  enforcement  program.  The  Commission  looks  forward  to 
working with the Committee on the problem of spyware.

Senator SMITH. Thank you Ms. Majoras. I assume from your tes-
timony  that  the  FTC  could  use  some  more  authority,  because  it 
supports the Allen bill that I’ve introduced with him. Is that accu-
rate, you could use some more authority to do more rulemaking on 
this issue? 

Ms.  MAJORAS.  Well,  we  could,  as  you  and  Senator  Allen  have 
pointed  out,  we  do  believe  that  we  have  legal  authority  to  attack 
spyware  and  we’ve  already  done  it  in  five  different  cases,  but  we 
would like additional authority to work with our counterparts over-
seas,  we  think  that’s  absolutely  critical  and  we  think  we  really 
could  use  civil  penalty  authority  to  assist  us  in  bringing  actions 
and remedying them. 

Senator  SMITH.  And  how  about  more  resources?  If  you  had  your 
druthers would you be getting more authority or more resources to 
prosecute cases? 

Ms.  MAJORAS.  That’s  always  a  tough  question  whether  we  need 
more  resources.  We  work  very  hard  on  the  budget  process  with 
Congress  to  get  whatever  resources  we  think  we’re  going  to  need 
for  the  year.  It’s  tough  for  me  to  turn  down  more  resources  if 
they’re  being  offered.  But  I  don’t  think—resources  have  been  less 
a problem than I think, folks are concerned about the bigger prob-
lem,  which  has  been  finding  the  folks  who  are  distributing  the 
spyware  and  then  being  able  to  serve  them.  They  obviously  can 
hide  behind  the  Internet,  they  can  skip  town,  they  can  skip  the 
country, they go to other countries and hide, and that has actually 
been  the  biggest  problem.  We  are  using  our  resources  as  wisely  as 
we can. We are squeezing every bit we can out of every dollar, and 
our  anti-spyware  program  is  part  of  the  larger  program  that  in-
cludes spam, and Internet fraud, on which we’re devoting substan-
tial resources. 

Senator SMITH. What percentage would be coming into our coun-
try  from  abroad,  and  what  percentage  starts  here  in  the  United 
States? 

Ms. MAJORAS. We don’t have exact percentages, it’s very hard to 
tell.  But  certainly  we  think  a  great  majority  of  spyware  is  either 
coming in from outside the United States, or is making use of a for-
eign  intermediary  in  some  way  to  attack  consumers  in  the  United 
States. 

Senator SMITH. And in the global economy in which we live, you 
need  more  authority  to  deal  with  the  international  component,  I 
think that has been very clearly demonstrated. 

Senator Nelson. 
Senator  BILL NELSON.  Good  afternoon  Madam  Chairman.  Tell 
me  if  you  agree  with  the  following  statement  of  principles,  that 
software  should  not  be  installed  without  a  consumers  knowledge 
and consent. 

Ms. MAJORAS. If it harms consumers, I do agree with that. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:20 Jun 14, 2006 Jkt 027822 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

15

Senator  BILL NELSON.  Consumers  should  know  who  is  installing 

the software on their computer. 
Ms. MAJORAS. Generally, yes. 
Senator BILL NELSON. Consumers should have the ability to com-

pletely remove software from their computers. 

Ms. MAJORAS. Again, most of it, yes. 
Senator  BILL NELSON.  If  software  is  going  to  collect  information 
about  a  consumer,  the  software  should  inform  the  consumer  first. 

Ms. MAJORAS. Generally yes. 
Senator BILL NELSON. If software is going to cause ads to appear 

it should make clear what is causing the ads. 

Ms. MAJORAS. That one is a little bit trickier, we have taken that 

on a case-by-case basis. 

Senator  BILL NELSON.  In  your  testimony,  we’re  going  to—you’ve 
addressed  it  and  we’ve  got  to  confront  the  question  of  preemption. 
Do you think that it’s important to preserve general state consumer 
protection laws as potential state-level tools against software? 

Ms. MAJORAS. We do. In almost any context, we support allowing 
the  state  attorneys  general  to  continue  to  enforce  their  consumer 
protection statutes. Having said that, there are certainly instances 
in which businesses really need consistent—if businesses are going 
to  get  guidance,  we  all  benefit  if  it’s  consistent  across  the  Nation. 
Senator  BILL NELSON.  Do  you  think  it  would  be  helpful  to  have 
some  baseline  standards  for  what  kind  of  behavior  is  acceptable, 
what disclosures should be given to consumers, and a statement of 
the right to uninstall software? 

Ms. MAJORAS. Well, with respect to disclosures, the FTC has pro-
vided  general  guidance  to  companies  for  a  number  of  years  in  the 
form  of  something  we  call  Dot  Com  Disclosures,  so  we’ve  already 
provided  some  general  guidance.  Our  only  concern  about  making 
the  guidance  too  specific  Senator  Nelson,  is  that  the  landscape 
keeps  changing  and  those  who  insist  on  perpetrating  fraud  and 
harming  consumers  find  new  ways  to  do  it.  And  so  the  concern 
with being too specific about what is permitted and what isn’t, not 
only  is  you  have  to  get  the  words  exactly  right,  so  that  you  don’t 
prevent  what  should  be  legal  conduct,  but  also  we  have  to  worry 
about  the  future,  and  we  don’t  want  to  bring  a  case,  and  only  to 
be  told,  well,  because  that  particular  practice  wasn’t  specifically 
listed  in  the  piece  of  legislation,  therefore  the  FTC  cannot  attack 
it. 

Senator  BILL NELSON.  I  understand.  I’m  talking  about  more 
baseline  standards,  on  behaviors,  on  disclosures,  and  on  the  right 
to uninstall. 

Ms. MAJORAS. We think the FTC has put a lot of that out there, 
but yes, there’s no question that business can always use guidance, 
and  those  businesses  who  actually  have  an  interest  in  complying 
with the law. 

Senator  BILL NELSON.  And  give  us  your  opinion  about  the  basic 
right of a consumer to have the ability to remove software from his 
or her computer? 

Ms.  MAJORAS.  Well,  we’ve  actually  brought  cases  in  which  we 
have  alleged  violations  of  the  FTC  Act  because  consumers  do  not 
have  that  right,  including  the  case  that  I  mentioned  earlier  today, 
Odysseus Marketing. So we do think it is a violation if software is 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:20 Jun 14, 2006 Jkt 027822 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

16

downloaded  to  a  consumer’s  computer  that  is  causing  some  harm, 
and the consumer cannot find a reasonable means to remove it. 

Senator BILL NELSON. Thank you. 
Senator SMITH. Senator Burns. 
Senator  BURNS.  Madam  Chairman,  thank  you  again  for  coming 
today.  You’re  probably  aware  that  there  are  several  industry 
groups  working  on  definitions  of  spyware.  It  always  seems  like 
when  we  get  into  these  kind  of  situations  we  all  define  the  same 
thing  in  different  ways  and  usually  definitions  are  what  lawyers 
make a living at, and enforcement becomes more difficult. To what 
degree, do you think the FTC can work with these industry groups, 
and  to  get  efforts  underway  and  do  you  think  it  is  important  that 
we  have  a  public  rulemaking  process?  We  all  say  awareness  is  ev-
erything,  and  a  public  process  in  which  we  make  the  rules  and 
then  we  define  the  terms.  What’s  your  attitude  toward  a  situation 
like that? 

Ms. MAJORAS. Well, I certainly think that working together with 
industry is critical in attacking spyware and obviously if legislation 
is  being  considered  it’s  critical  because  these  folks  are  the  experts. 
And  they  can  tell  us,  not  only  explain  to  us  not  only  what’s  out 
there today, but they’re also thinking several steps ahead. And that 
can be very important if we’re trying to put in place rules that are 
going to work on a going forward basis. So I think that can be very 
important.  One  thing  I  would  caution  against  though  is  I  know 
that  many  in  industry  have  been  anxious  to  really  come  up  with 
the  definition  of  spyware.  And  I  think  part  of  the  reason  why  it’s 
been difficult to come up with a definition that everyone can agree 
on is again, because we have a bit of a moving target. And so what 
we’ve  tried  to  do  at  the  FTC  is  we’re  really  looking  at  two  things: 
whether the software has been downloaded without the consumer’s 
permission,  and  causes  some  substantial  harm  to  the  consumer; 
that  is  really  what  we’ve  been  operating  under.  Call  it  spyware, 
call  it  adware,  call  it  malware,  that  is  what  we  have  been  looking 
at when we bring a case. 

Senator BURNS. And also on the awareness, that same thing, now 
you’ve  got  some  proceedings  going  on  for  consumers.  Can  you  tell 
us  how  those  proceedings  are  going,  were  there  fines  levied  where 
if individual consumers, their computers were hurt, or crashed, did 
they get compensated, their computers back up and running again, 
or  new  hard  drive,  or  whatever.  Did  they  get  their  money  back  on 
their  software  of  whatever,  can  you  give  us  some  kind  of  an  idea 
of the results you’ve had in these proceedings? 

Ms.  MAJORAS.  Yes  Senator,  we’ve  brought  five  cases  since  last 
October,  both  the  first  case,  and  the  last  case  we  brought  are  still 
in litigation. In the first case we brought we were able to get a pre-
liminary  injunction  against  the  conduct  and  that  was  a  case  in 
which  we  alleged  in  the  complaint  that  in  fact,  yes,  the  purveyor 
of  the  spyware  hijacked  the  consumers’  computers  and  changed 
their  settings  and  the  like,  changed  their  home  pages,  and 
downloaded  personal  information.  That  case  is  still  in  litigation, 
similarly  obviously  we’ve  just  announced  the  case  we  filed  last 
week,  in  which  spyware  was  downloaded  without  consumers’  per-
mission  and  again,  essentially  in  this  case  what  we  allege  in  the 
complaint is that it has taken over the consumer’s computer. That’s 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:20 Jun 14, 2006 Jkt 027822 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

17

still in litigation. We’ve brought a couple of cases against those who 
claim that they’re selling an anti-spyware solution, when in fact it’s 
a solution that doesn’t work, and so in those two instances both of 
those respondents did settle those cases with us, and we were able 
to get some consumer redress, if I recall correctly. 

And we brought one additional case in which the respondent ad-
vertised  a  free  download  of  security  software.  But  then  didn’t  tell 
consumers that if they downloaded this free security software they 
would  also  get  adware  attached  to  their  computer,  so  then  they 
would be barraged with pop-up ads and the like and that case also 
settled. 

Senator  BURNS.  In  other  words  they  used  the  spy  block  tech-
nology  to  implant  their  own  adware  stuff  without  telling  the  cus-
tomers, is that correct? 

Ms. MAJORAS. I’m not sure which technology they used, but with-
out sufficient disclosure to the consumer they did download adware 
to the computer. 

Senator BURNS. Now since these proceedings have been filed and 
you’ve  been  in  them,  are  there  any  surprises  about—do  you  have 
resources to take the case to final? 

Ms.  MAJORAS.  We  do  have  resources  I  think  to  take  these  cases 
to final. The biggest surprises probably have been—really probably 
came  in  the  beginning.  We  started  trying  to  figure  out  a  way  how 
we were going to investigate these cases and we infected two of our 
own  computers  so  badly  with  spyware  that  they  couldn’t  be  used 
anymore  and  so  we  learned  a  lot.  And  so  one  of  the  things  we’ve 
done during this time period as we’ve been bringing these cases is, 
we’ve  bought  some  new  computers,  some  new  software,  and  some 
new hardware to assist us in going forward. As I said, we’re learn-
ing as we go through this. 

Senator  BURNS.  Well,  I  thank  you  for  your  work.  And  I  don’t 
think  there’s  a  person  up  here  today  that  doesn’t  want  to  get  you 
some  legislation  and  empower  with  you  a  little  more  power  than 
you  have  now,  because  I  think  you’re  on  the  right  track.  And  also 
the  differences  that  we  have,  we’ll  get  those  worked  out  and  I 
would  hope  that  we  could  have  something  on  the  President’s  desk 
and  for  you  to  look  at  pretty  quickly.  So  thank  you  for  your  testi-
mony.  I  read  your  testimony,  and  I  concur  in  a  lot  of  the  subjects 
that you brought up there, so thank you for coming today. 

Mr. Chairman, thank you. 
Senator SMITH. Thank you Senator Burns. 
Senator Allen. 
Senator  ALLEN.  Thank  you  Mr.  Chairman,  four  different  things, 
trying to get some clarification here. One is authority, second is re-
sources, third is penalties, and fourth is what jurisdiction or stand-
ards  we  should  be  applying.  Insofar  as  authority,  and  I’ll  ask  you 
some  questions,  it  seems  like  you  have  all  the  authority  you  need. 
Resources,  you  say  you  don’t  need  more,  but  you—then  on  author-
ity,  the  area  that  you  need  it  more  in,  is  not  necessarily  domestic 
but  international.  Resources  you  say  you  have  enough,  penalties, 
you  need  stronger  penalties,  particularly  civil  penalty  standards. 
The  question  is  whether  you  have  50  or  40  different  standards,  or 
a  standard  for  all  the  United  States  and  its  territories.  Now  has 
there  ever  been  a  situation  where  the  FTC  could  not  bring  a  case 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:20 Jun 14, 2006 Jkt 027822 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

18

because  you  don’t  have  sufficient  authority  under  existing  laws, 
other  than,  aside  from  the  U.S.  SAFE  WEB  Act,  which  is  incor-
porated  in  part,  and  this  is  Senator  Smith’s  measure.  Is  there  any 
new  authority  that  the  FTC  needs  if  you  find  in  other  words  that 
somebody  regardless  of  what  their  doing,  if  it’s  fraudulent  and  de-
ceptive you can prosecute them, if it is misleading, if it is false and 
so forth. Has there ever been a situation where you didn’t have the 
legal authority to prosecute within the United States? 

Ms. MAJORAS. With respect to spyware, I’m not aware of any, no. 
Senator  ALLEN.  So  you  feel  that  other  than  internationally,  but 
within  these  orders  of  the  United  States,  and  our  territories,  you 
feel  the  FTC  has  the  authority  regardless  of  what  the  technology 
or method of deception is utilized? 

Ms.  MAJORAS.  Well,  we’ve  successfully  brought  cases,  we’ve  got 
more  in  the  pipeline.  So  that’s  correct.  Other  than  what  I’ve  said 
about civil penalty authority, yes. 

Senator ALLEN. What you do want is you want more civil author-
ity.  Civil  penalties,  I  guess  you  could  call  that  authority  as  well. 

Ms. MAJORAS. We think that could be very helpful. 
Senator  ALLEN.  And  that’s  included  in  the  measure  the  Chair-
man  and  I  have  introduced.  Now  if  the  Congress  codified  prescrip-
tive definitions of illegal behavior that are specific to current tech-
nology, could we run the risk that this law could be obsolete as new 
technology continues to develop. 

In other words by defining a specific illegal behavior, are we cre-
ating  loopholes  for  spyware  purveyors  who  figure  out  ways  to  get 
around the law? 

Ms. MAJORAS. Well, that is possible. I mean, obviously Section 5 
of the FTC Act would still be in effect, so we would hope that there 
was something that [inaudible] cracks, but we’d be able to use our 
broad authority to go after them. But what we wouldn’t want is for 
a court to say, well it’s not on the list, so therefore, sorry FTC, you 
can’t go after them. That’s really our only reservation. 

Senator  ALLEN.  Because  in  effect,  you  could  end  up  with  a  safe 
harbor  for  those  using  these  fraudulent  deceptive  practices  if 
they’re not on that list, the court could say, well they’re not on the 
list, so therefore you cannot prosecute. 

Ms.  MAJORAS.  It’s  possible,  we  can’t  say  for  sure  that’s  how  a 

court would interpret it. 

Senator  ALLEN.  Now  so  far,  on  the  issue  of  jurisdiction,  in  the 
standard,  so  far  18  states  have  enacted  legislation  regarding 
spyware  and  many  new  laws  are  pending  in  several  states.  Since 
spyware,  clearly  by  its  nature  is  national,  in  fact  it’s  international 
in  its  scope.  Do  you  agree  that  a  national  framework  is  necessary 
to  ensure  a  patchwork  of  state  laws  do  not  unnecessarily  confuse 
and burden consumers and legitimate software providers? 

Ms.  MAJORAS.  I  think  it’s  possible,  depending  on  the  differences 
among  the  various  state  laws  that—probably  consumers,  less  so—
but  that  those  who  are  actually  trying  to  comply  with  the  law.  I 
mean  they  simply  can’t  in  the  Internet  context  comply  with  mul-
tiple  standards.  I  mean  basically  they  would  have  to  figure  out 
what the highest standard is, I believe, and then comply with that 
one.  And  so—and  if  that  weren’t  the  Federal,  if  there  are  Federal 
standards, and that ends up not being the highest one, then I sup-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:20 Jun 14, 2006 Jkt 027822 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

19

pose  whichever  state  had  the  highest  standard  would  become  the 
de facto standard for the Nation. 

Senator  ALLEN.  Well,  for  your  enforcement  would  it  not  be  best 
to  have  a—the  best  standard,  the  strongest  standard,  the  most  ef-
fective  standard  that’s  set  for  the  Nation  by  the  Federal  Govern-
ment and Congress? 

Ms. MAJORAS. Well, I think a consistent standard would help all 
of us. And the fact of the matter is the state attorneys general are 
critical partners to us in this fight, but if we’re all singing from the 
same hymn book sort of speak, I think we can be very effective. 

Senator  ALLEN.  Well,  our  measure  does  have  the  attorneys  gen-
eral of the states involved, with a national standard, but have them 
helping  enforce  it,  because  in  some  cases  the  Federal  Government 
can’t do it all. 

Ms.  MAJORAS.  That’s  exactly  right.  We  would  want  the  states  to 

absolutely have authority. 

or 

statements, 

Senator ALLEN. All right. Now on the questions of notice, and the 
notice  and  consent  regime.  According  to  this  July  2005  Pew  Inter-
net  and  American  Life  Project,  73  percent  they  found  according  to 
them,  73  percent  of  Internet  users  do  not  always  read  user  agree-
ments,  privacy 
other  disclaimers,  before 
downloading, or installing programs. There are some of us who will 
click  through  things  real  quickly  because  you  want  to  read  some-
thing. In fact, one study of a user agreement included a clause that 
promised  $1,000  to  the  first  person  to  write  in  and  request  that 
$1,000. The agreement was downloaded more than 3,000 times be-
fore  somebody  finally  read  the  fine  print  and  claimed  the  reward. 
Now  do  you  believe  that  subjecting  the  entire  software  industry  to 
a new notice and consent regime will help combat spyware? 

Ms.  MAJORAS.  Overall,  no,  I  don’t  think  that  would  be  the  most 
effective  tool.  Our  experience,  while  I  don’t  have  statistics,  com-
ports  very  closely  with  the  conclusion  of  that  survey.  And  that  is, 
for better or for worse, consumers don’t read these disclosures, and 
the  more  they  are  bombarded  with  similar  disclosures,  the  less 
likely  they  are  to  read  them.  And  what  our  concern  has  been  is 
that  we  could  have  a  spyware  distributor  who  is  distributing 
spyware that is very, very harmful to consumers, but then can just 
say,  well  I  disclosed  it  to  consumers  that  this  is  what  I  was  going 
to do, so too bad for them. And while that has, no question, sensa-
tional appeal, because none of us want to be extraordinarily pater-
nalistic  to  American  consumers.  When  we  know  that  they  don’t 
read these disclosures when they’re downloading software, it makes 
it hard to say that’s what we think would truly, would truly protect 
consumers. 

What  we’re  doing  in  our  casework,  is  looking  at  disclosures  on  a 

case-by-case basis to see if we think they’re adequate. 

Senator ALLEN. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator SMITH. Thank you, Senator Allen. 
Senator ALLEN. Thank you, Madam Chairman. 
Senator  SMITH.  To  Senator  Allen’s  point  and  your  answer,  that 
you  today  announced  the  Odysseus  case  that  you’re  pursuing,  and 
is  this  not  a  company  that  offers  through  peer-to-peer  enticements 
to  children,  free  music  and  other  things  that  they  readily  go  past 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:20 Jun 14, 2006 Jkt 027822 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

20

the  disclosures  to  get  what’s  free,  but  in  the  end  it’s  maybe  very 
promotional, and a very degrading thing? 

Ms. MAJORAS. It’s similar, they were working in the peer-to-peer 
realm. And the representation they made was that by downloading 
their software, your peer-to-peer presence would be anonymous and 
no one would be able to trace you. That, we alleged, isn’t true. And 
then, in addition, they’ve downloaded a lot of other software, which 
in  essence  as  we  say  in  the  complaint,  just  to  summarize  it  here, 
hijacks the consumer’s computer. 

Senator SMITH. Isn’t that already illegal? 
Ms. MAJORAS. Yes. We’ve filed a suit under Section 5 of the FTC 

Act. 

Senator SMITH. Do you think you’ll win, if it’s already illegal? Be-

cause I want to make sure it’s illegal. 

[Laughter.] 
Ms.  MAJORAS.  Well,  I  certainly  understand  that  Senator,  and  I 
can’t—I couldn’t tell you that nobody would ever challenge our au-
thority  or  that  a  judge  would  never—you  know  could  never  find 
that  we  didn’t  have  such  authority,  but  it’s  not  been  a  problem  to 
date. And we feel that this isn’t a close call under Section 5 of the 
FTC Act and so we brought the case. 

Senator  SMITH.  So  the  people  who  are  maybe  here,  or  interested 
in  it.  I  understand  that  the  software  actually  changes  your  search 
results  that  consumers  get  from  search  engines,  like  Google  and 
Yahoo, and that this is done without the consumers knowledge. 

Ms.  MAJORAS.  That’s  exactly  right.  I  mean  we  don’t  think  that 
they have a way necessarily of knowing. So as you know it’s impor-
tant  to  some,  to  be  the  first  in  a  Google  search  results,  or  what 
have  you,  and  this  apparently  can  change  the  results  around,  but 
again,  no,  the  consumers  wouldn’t  necessarily  know  that  was  even 
happening to them. 

Senator  SMITH.  Well,  if  you  find  out  it  isn’t  illegal,  let  us  know. 
Ms. MAJORAS. You would be the first call we would make. 
Senator  SMITH.  I  mean  our  bill  does  address  this  very  kind  of 
thing. And so you know, that’s why we keep asking you if you need 
any  more  resources,  do  you  need  more  authorities?  Because  this 
really  gets  to  the  heart  of  what  we’re  trying  to  accomplish  for  the 
protection of American consumers without stifling innovation in fu-
ture technologies. Do you see a way? I mean you’ve heard all of us 
up here, all agreeing there’s a problem we want to fix, and the dif-
ference  and  the  difficulty  is  in  the  breadth  of  how  we  would  go 
about  it.  I  guess  as  you  evaluate  the  two  different  bills  that  are 
represented here, is there a way to merge them in your mind? 

Ms.  MAJORAS.  Well,  I  think  there’s  probably,  there  probably  is  a 
way to bring it together and one—I mean if we could classify them, 
your  bill  restates  the  FTC’s  authority  to  attack  software,  but  in  a 
more  general  way.  The  other  bill  tries  to  be  a  bit  more  specific 
about  it.  And  I  would  just  caution  that  if  specifics  are  going  to  be 
added  to  any  legislation  that  becomes  law  that  it  is  made  abso-
lutely  clear  that  other  types  of  conduct  may  also  be  illegal,  within 
this  same  family  and  that  the  FTC’s  authority  is  not  being  nar-
rowed by this. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:20 Jun 14, 2006 Jkt 027822 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

agencies. 

Smith. 

much. Yes, please. 

tions. 

Senator SMITH. You need them too? 
Ms.  MAJORAS.  We  do,  I  can’t  emphasize  it  enough  Chairman 

Senator  SMITH.  Well,  Chairwoman  Majoras,  thank  you  very 

Senator  ALLEN.  My  time  has  expired  but  may  ask  some  ques-

21

Senator  SMITH.  And  if  we  leave  it  broad,  to  the  degree  you  need 
to  make  it  narrower,  do  you  have  rulemaking  authorities  to  make 
it narrower? 

Ms.  MAJORAS.  Well,  we  would  have  rulemaking  authority  if  you 
gave it to us, if it was needed. The one area where I think it’s dif-
ficult to reconcile is with respect to notice. Which again I agree has 
very—has facial appeal, it does to me too, but I just don’t—our ex-
perience  is  it  doesn’t  actually  protect  consumers.  And  since  that’s 
our job, it’s hard for me to support that. 

Senator  SMITH.  And  there’s  a  lot  of  advertising  that  is  actually 
promoting  very  valuable  things,  and  useful  products  and  we  don’t 
want to get in the way of that. 

Ms. MAJORAS. No. No, we don’t want to get in the way of it, and 
in  fact  there  may  be  First  Amendment  issues  if  we  tried  to  go  too 
far. 

Senator  SMITH.  As  I  understand  the  U.S.  SAFE  WEB  Act  which 
you  have  indicated  your  support  for,  its  provisions  are  really  not 
all  that  new  or  unusual,  there  are  other  agencies  in  the  govern-
ment  that  already  have  these  powers,  is  that  your  understanding? 
Ms.  MAJORAS.  Absolutely.  The  SEC,  the  CFTC,  and  banking 

Senator SMITH. Yes, please go ahead. 
Senator  ALLEN.  I  just  want  to  follow  up  on  your  good  probative 
questions.  Your  caution  trying  to  figure  these  things  out,  several 
things  that  you  asked  for,  you  asked  for  the  international  author-
ity,  the  U.S.  SAFE  WEB  Act,  that’s  part  of  our  measure,  it  is  not 
part of Senator Burns’ measures. So that was one thing where you 
wanted  regular  authority.  That  probably  can  be  merged  together. 
We  do  have  a  fundamental  difference  on  the  jurisdiction  and  how 
you  define  illegal  behavior,  which  right  now  is  very  broad.  If  it’s 
fraudulent  or  deceptive,  if  it’s  misleading,  you  know,  it’s  illegal 
which is what you’d want. You could limit yourself by prosecutorial 
discretion I suppose, and in a court the trier of fact would say, well 
no  that  isn’t  deceptive.  As  opposed  to  specifying  a  bunch  of  dif-
ferent specific illegal methods, which could end up with a safe har-
bor if it’s not on that list. And maybe the solution to that, is to say 
well these are illegal but they are not the only ones that are illegal. 
Anything  is,  but  then  the  other  side  feels  like  all  right,  we’ve  at 
least  specified  these.  I  suppose  that  could  be  worked  out.  The  no-
tice  issue  is  one  that  I  do  think  is  irreconcilable.  Because  as  I 
was—there  was  a  reason  I  asked  that  question,  and  why  some 
3,000  hits  are  getting  $3,000.  Folks  just  simply  don’t  read  it,  they 
don’t  have  time  for  it.  Even  looking  on  this—who’s  going  to  go 
through—now  I  think  it’s  helpful  for  those  in  the  IT  departments 
of  companies,  somebody’s  going  through  all  that,  and  seeing  which 
are  good  spyware  blocker  programs.  But  a  normal  person  in  their 
home  is  just  generally  not  going  to  go  through  all  that.  So  there 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:20 Jun 14, 2006 Jkt 027822 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

22

does need to be a better business bureau approach. And I see that’s 
what  that  is.  Now  you  get  into  the  issue  of  jurisdiction.  That’s  a 
key  one  as  to  whether  you  have  a  national  standard,  or  50  or  40 
different  states  standards.  I  think  to  make  companies  to  have  to 
comply  with  40  different  standards,  and  maybe  different  nuances 
and  different  case  law  and  all  the  rest  makes  it  very  difficult.  To 
me  that  is  not  irreconcilable  difference.  Now  I  think  it’s  important 
to  respect  the  rights,  and  prerogatives  of  the  states,  and  prosecu-
tion  and  that’s  why  in  our  measure  we  do  have  the  attorneys  gen-
eral brought in. 

You  wanted  also  the  civil  fines,  which  will  be  helpful.  The  one 
thing I find interesting though was your answer on the question of, 
you  don’t  need  any  more  resources.  Here’s  my  perspective  of  that. 
Is  that  this  is  so  pervasive  and  you  have  nearly  50  percent  of  all 
computers  being  hit  with  this  spyware,  and  it’s  great  that  you’ve 
brought  these  big  cases,  and  you’ve  knocked  down  organizations, 
spyware  organizations  and  you  say  how  difficult  it  is  to  prosecute 
and  find  these  people,  well  if  you’re  dealing  with  normal  criminal 
behavior  and  you  have  a  certain  amount  of  resources,  if  you  actu-
ally  had  more  detectives  so  to  speak,  more  investigators,  more 
funds  if  there  were  drug  dealing  for  undercover  agents,  or  making 
drug buys, or—those resources do matter in combating illegal drug 
activity. 

So I find it interesting that you say that you don’t need any more 
resources when this is such a big pervasive problem of this fraudu-
lent  and  deceptive  activity.  If  you  have  the  civil  penalties  and  I 
don’t know the answer to this, but where do the fines, if fines are—
does  that  go  to  the  general  fund,  or  does  that  go—would  that  go 
to further law enforcement efforts? 

Ms.  MAJORAS.  I  believe  it  goes  to  the  general  fund,  yes.  It  goes 

into the Treasury. It goes into the Treasury. 

Senator  ALLEN.  All  right.  In  drug  dealing,  with  asset  forfeiture, 
for those assets that are traceable to illegal drug dealing, that actu-
ally  goes  Mr.  Chairman  to  law  enforcement  so  that  they  use  it  for 
undercover  drug  buys,  paying  overtime,  surveillance  costs,  some-
times  paying  informants  for  example,  it’s  like  catching  the  shark 
and  cutting  it  up  for  bait.  Use  the  assets  to  catch  more  sharks. 
Why  do  you  say  that  you  don’t  need  more  resources  with—and 
maybe this is what the Administration wants you to say and I un-
derstand  that,  having  been  a  Governor,  I  expected  all  my  agency 
heads to tow the line. But with something that is so pervasive, and 
obviously  of  bipartisan  concern,  and  not  just  us,  but  obviously  to 
the  American  people  and  to  the  technology  community  generally 
and the Internet, why would it not be helpful for you to have more 
personnel  to  actually  get  after  this  obviously  growing,  disruptive, 
illegal behavior? 

Ms.  MAJORAS.  Well,  I  appreciate  the  question  and,  no,  Senator, 
nobody’s asked me to tow any line on this. You know we’ve actually 
been  very  pleased.  We  think  as  other  agencies  have  been  cut  back 
in  the  last  couple  of  years,  as  some  belts  have  been  tightened,  we 
think that Congress has been very generous with us, which we ap-
preciate and that they recognize the importance of our work. 

Look, if you give us more resources, we’ll——
Senator ALLEN. What would you do with them? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:20 Jun 14, 2006 Jkt 027822 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

23

Ms.  MAJORAS.—certainly  use  them.  Well,  probably  one  of  the 
things I would do, is I would hire some more tech experts, who can 
help us with some of the difficulties in actually hunting down these 
folks, or in helping us find ways to push industry in the right direc-
tion.  Because  I  do  think  that  ultimately  technology  will—is  what 
will help us prevail. So I think we can. But the only issue I would 
say  with  respect  to  having  a  very  large  amount  of  new  funds, 
which  are  actually  earmarked  for  a  particular  purpose,  is  that 
what tends to happen is then if priorities shift and change, because 
for  example  new  spyware  tools  come  out  and  that  tends  to  be  less 
a  problem,  and  the  bad  guys,  if  you  will,  have  moved  on  to  some-
thing else, then we have to come back to you and say, look we have 
this pot of money, which you wanted us to use for this purpose, but 
quite  frankly  priorities  have  changed,  and  they  would  have  even 
changed for you. And so that’s part of something that we obviously 
would have to work with you on, Senator. 

But obviously our job is to enforce the laws that Congress passes 
and  to  take  our  lead  from  consumers  first,  and  obviously  you  are 
the  elected  representatives  who  represent  them.  So  if  you  want  us 
to  have  more  resources  to  send  the  message  to  us  that  I’ve  got  to 
put more investigators on this, then obviously we will do that. 

Senator  ALLEN.  Well,  in  the  event  you  actually  solve  this  prob-
lem  quickly,  obviously  appropriations  are  annual.  Even  if  appro-
priations  actually  get  done  in  a  timely  manner,  I  suspect  that  the 
fines and forfeitures that you will glean from these added—not that 
the  law  enforcement  is  simply  to  gain  money  for  the  government, 
but  I  suspect  with  greater  enforcement  not  only  will  you  have  the 
Internet  being  more  useful  and  less  aggravating  and  less—fewer 
computers  shut  down  because  they’re  clogged  up  with  all  of  this 
spyware,  is  that  you’ll  actually  end  up  getting  more  fines  and  for-
feitures, and assets seized than that $10 million over the period of 
this  measure.  And  if  you  didn’t  need  the  money,  you  can  always 
say, we need it more for something else. But I don’t see this getting 
solved  in  the  next  few  years.  I  think  it  could  be  ameliorated,  I 
think  it  could  be  mitigated,  but  this  is—it’s  too  lucrative  a  busi-
ness, illegal enterprise right now, and to the extent you drive it out 
of this country, you’re still going to have it overseas, and that’s why 
the  U.S.  SAFE  WEB  Act  is  so  important  and  have  the  inter-
national community caring as much about this as we try to get the 
international  community  to  care  about  intellectual  property  rights 
for example. 

Ms. MAJORAS. That’s right. 
Senator  ALLEN.  To  the  extent  you  ever  get  it  to  that  point,  fine, 
we’ll  save  some  money  there.  And  you’re  doing  a  great  job,  and 
you’ve had some good noteworthy cases, but you also recognize that 
it’s just the tip of the iceberg in this illegal spyware enterprise. 

Ms.  MAJORAS.  Indeed,  not  only  do  we  recognize  it,  but  we  would 
hate  to  raise  expectations  way  too  high,  because  we’re  going  to 
keep at this. I mean, you know, we talk all the time about how the 
worst  thing  that  could  happen  to  us  would  be  for  our  consumers 
to  just  simply  lose  faith  in  this  wonderful  new  medium  that  we 
have  that  is  the  Internet.  And  we  can’t  let  that  happen,  and  we 
have to—we really have to guard and protect consumer’s confidence 
in  it.  So  we’re  going  to  keep  at  it.  But  I  point  out  the  difficulties 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:20 Jun 14, 2006 Jkt 027822 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

24

in tracking these folks down and so forth, only to remind us again 
that  it  won’t  be  just  law  enforcement  that’s  going  to  tackle  this 
problem, we need new technology. 

And  the  good  news  is,  that  if  we  do  get  these  additional  inter-
national  resources,  we  can  leverage  that.  We  spend  a  lot  of  re-
sources trying to chase down people in countries where we’re trying 
to  hire  lawyers  who  know  what  they’re  doing  over  there  when  we 
don’t,  and  so  on  and  so  forth,  and  we  could  use  our  counterparts 
and  vice  versa,  then  we  will  be  actually  a  lot  more  efficient  even 
in our use of resources. 

So I appreciate your point Senator Allen. 
Senator ALLEN. Well, thank you. And thank you, Mr. Chairman, 
just  understand  Madam  Chairman  that  the  Chairman  here  and 
this Senator want to work with you and do this effectively. And we 
do  feel  that  you  need  out  of  jurisdiction  as  you  say,  or  added  au-
thority.  And  I  do  feel  that  you  do  need  more  resources  to  get  the 
job  done,  and  it  shouldn’t  just  be  the  government,  it  does  need  to 
be  the  technology  industry.  They  are  the  ones  who  are  the  most 
creative  in  coming  up  with  the  firewalls,  and  the  filters,  and  the 
ways to block unwanted spyware, or illegal spyware. There is some 
spyware  which  has—and  you  were  very  clever  answering  those 
questions  of  Senator  Nelson.  But  you  know  in  some  cases  it’s  not 
harmful, it’s not deceptive and so forth. I do think it’s going to take 
a  concerted  team  effort  on  the  part  of  the  technology  community 
and  actually  probably  can—I  just  have  faith  in  their  innovative, 
creative capabilities to make sure the Internet stays a great inven-
tion for the dissemination of information and ideas, and commerce, 
and education, and tele-medicine, and in so many ways, improving 
our lives in commerce. So I thank you again Mr. Chairman for your 
leadership,  look  forward  to  working  with  you,  and  Madam  Chair-
man, thank you for articulate principled leadership. 

Ms. MAJORAS. Thank you very much, Senator Allen. 
Senator  SMITH.  And  Madam  Chairman,  to  Senator  Allen’s  point, 
I  think  if  you  hear  anything  today  it  is  that  this  is  an  enormous 
problem  and  it  requires  urgent  effort,  and  so  please  know  we’re 
counting on you, we appreciate you, and we hope you convey to ev-
eryone at the FTC we appreciate their good work. We recognize in 
our mailboxes that there is growing alarm and we need to be ahead 
of it. So thank you, and with that we’re adjourned. 

Ms. MAJORAS. Thank you very much, Senator. 
[Whereupon, at 3:40 p.m., the Committee adjourned.] 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:20 Jun 14, 2006 Jkt 027822 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

A P P E N D I X

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO

HON. DEBORAH P. MAJORAS 

Response to Questions One and Three 

Your  letter  poses  two  questions  about  the  nature  and  efficacy  of  the  FTC’s  con-
sumer  education  efforts  related  to  spyware.  Your  letter  commends  the  FTC  and  in-
dustry  for  launching  a  new  website,  www.OnGuardOnline.gov.,  but  expresses  the 
concern that the website uses technical terms (e.g., updating operating systems, fire-
walls,  and  drive-by  installations)  that  consumers,  particularly  seniors,  may  not  un-
derstand.  Your  letter  also  cites  statistics  as  to  the  prevalence  of  spyware  on  com-
puters and asks about the Commission’s short-term and long-term goals to decrease 
its prevalence through consumer education. 

The  Commission  shares  your  concern  about  the  importance  of  educating  con-
sumers  about  problems  in  electronic  commerce,  including  spyware.  To  inform  con-
sumers about spyware and other threats on the Internet, the Commission launched 
its  OnGuard  Online  initiative,  with  the  OnGuardOnline.gov  website  as  its  primary 
consumer  education  tool.  The  initiative  was  developed  to  address  the  need  for  a 
comprehensive,  consistent  set  of  educational  messages  for  consumers.  It  incor-
porates  the  best  learning  of  the  Internet  community  and  presents  it  in  a  complete 
and accessible format. In consultation with communications experts, it was designed 
to  be  usable  by  consumers  with  a  broad  range  of  familiarity  with  the  Internet  and 
technology.  The  comprehensive  website  uses  interactive  activities,  articles,  videos, 
and tips that address topics important to consumers, including ways that consumers 
can  lower  their  risk  of  spyware  infections,  clues  as  to  whether  spyware  is  on  their 
computer,  and  an  informative  spyware  quiz.  Consumers  are  also  able  to  report  via 
the website if they have been a victim of spyware. 

Because people learn in a variety of ways, the FTC has made the OnGuard Online 
information  available  in  many  forms.  The  OnGuardOnline.gov  website  includes 
video  tutorials  prepared  by  the  Internet  Education  Foundation  with  visual  instruc-
tions  to  ‘‘click  here,  then  here,’’  to  turn  on  the  security  features  in  various  types  of 
software.  The  site  also  presents  a  series  of  videos  prepared  by  Microsoft  with  the 
information presented in an accessible format. 

Some  consumers,  including  many  seniors,  may  not  be  familiar  with  technical 
terms  used  to  describe  technology.  The  OnGuard  Online  initiative  therefore  uses 
plain  language  to  describe  technical  concepts.  For  example,  the  OnGuard  Online 
brochure  explains  that  ‘‘[f]irewalls  help  keep  hackers  from  using  your  computer  to 
send  out  your  personal  information  without  your  permission.’’  In  addition,  the 
OnGuard  Online  bookmarks  and  posters  have  quick  tips  written  in  plain  language, 
and  the  OnguardOnline.gov  website  includes  an  extensive  glossary  of  computing 
terms, for consumers who need more information about the terms used. Finally, the 
AARP is a partner in the OnGuard Online initiative. 
Response to Question Two 

Your  letter  asks  whether  it  is  deceptive  to  fail  to  disclose  that  spyware  will  be 
installed.  Your  letter  also  asks  whether  it  is  deceptive  to  disclose  only  in  the  end-
user license agreement that spyware will be installed. 

It  is  well-established  that  a  failure  to  disclose  adequately  material  facts  to  con-
sumers may be unfair or deceptive in violation of Section 5 of the FTC Act. The FTC 
has  alleged  a  failure  to  disclose  information  in  a  number  of  Internet-related  decep-
tion  cases. 1 The  Commission  staff  also  has  issued  a  guidance  document  that  pro-

1 See, e.g., Juno Online Services, Inc., FTC Dkt. No. C–4016 (June 29, 2001) (failure to disclose 
that some subscribers to its ISP service would incur long distance telephone charges while con-
necting  to  the  Internet)  (consent  order);  BUY.COM,  Inc.,  FTC  Dkt.  No.  C–3978  (Sept.  8,  2000) 
(failure  to  disclose  restrictions  and  costs  associated  with  purchasing  a  ‘‘free’’  or  ‘‘low-cost’’  per-
Continued

(25)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:20 Jun 14, 2006 Jkt 027822 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

26

vides  advertisers  with  advice  as  to  how  to  apply  traditional  FTC  disclosure  prin-
ciples  to  the  online  environment,  including  advertising  and  marketing  software  on 
the Internet. 2 

The  Commission  has  addressed  the  failure  to  disclose  adequately  to  consumers 
the material fact that spyware would be installed on their computers. In particular, 
disclosing the presence of bundled software, including spyware, only in the end-user 
licensing  agreement  may  be  unfair  or  deceptive.  For  example,  in  FTC  v.  Odysseus 
Marketing, Inc., the defendants offered consumers a free software program that pur-
ported to make the consumers anonymous when using peer-to-peer file-sharing pro-
grams. 3 The  Commission  alleged,  however,  that  the  distributors  failed  to  disclose 
to  consumers  that  this  program,  in  turn,  would  install  other,  harmful  software  on 
their  computers.  Similarly,  in  Advertising.com,  Inc.,  the  respondents  allegedly  of-
fered free security software, but bundled with it software that caused consumers to 
receive a substantial number of pop-up ads. 4 Although the presence of this software 
was  disclosed  in  the  end-user  license  agreement,  the  Commission  alleged  that  this 
disclosure  was  inadequate.  The  Commission  therefore  is  using  its  authority  to  pro-
hibit  unfair  or  deceptive  acts  and  practices  to  take  law  enforcement  action  against 
those  who  fail  to  disclose  adequately  to  consumers  that  spyware  will  be  installed 
on  their  computers.  It  is  important  to  note  that,  as  I  indicated  in  my  testimony, 
such a case-by-case approach that focuses on bringing law enforcement action where 
a  failure  to  disclose  has  harmed  consumers  is  preferable  to  requiring  disclosure  for 
all software, no matter how innocuous. 
Response to Question Four 

As  the  Commission  indicated  in  its  testimony, 5 our  main  tool  for  combating 
spyware  is  bringing  law  enforcement  actions  challenging  acts  and  practices  as  un-
fair or deceptive in violation of Section 5 of the FTC Act. Your letter asks how many 
spyware-related  law  enforcement  actions  we  have  brought  in  2005,  as  well  as  for 
a description of our efforts to investigate spyware, given that many consumers may 
not know that they have spyware on their computers. 

Thus far, the FTC has brought six law enforcement actions involving spyware, in-
cluding  five  law  enforcement  actions  to  date  in  2005.  The  FTC’s  written  testimony 
at  the  recent  hearing  describes  the  FTC’s  first  five  actions.  Our  sixth  law  enforce-
ment action was filed after the hearing. 6 In the Enternet Media, Inc. case, the FTC 
alleged  that  the  defendants  distributed  via  the  Internet  exploitive  software  code 
dubbed  ‘‘Search  Miracle’’  and  ‘‘EliteBar,’’  onto  the  computers  of  unsuspecting  con-
sumers.  With  the  aid  of  their  network  of  affiliates,  the  complaint  alleged,  the  de-
fendants  trick  consumers  into  downloading  and  installing  their  exploitive  code  by 
disguising  it  as  harmless,  free  software,  such  as  Internet  browser  upgrades,  music 
files,  cell  phone  ring  tones,  and  song  lyrics.  However,  contrary  to  their  representa-
tions, the defendants’ code is not a browser upgrade or security patch, nor is it any 
type  of  harmless  free  software.  Rather,  it  functions  as  a  type  of  spyware  that  sub-
stantially  interferes  with  the  functionality  of  consumers’  computers,  such  as  by 
tracking  consumers’  Internet  activity,  changing  consumers’  homepage  settings,  in-
serting a new toolbar onto consumers’ Internet browsers, inserting an obtrusive win-
dow onto consumers’ computer screens that displays advertisements, and displaying 
voluminous  pop-up  advertisements,  even  when  consumers’  Internet  browsers  are 
closed.  To  make  matters  worse,  the  FTC  alleges,  it  is  extremely  difficult  for  con-
sumers  to  uninstall  the  exploitive  code,  and  that  the  defendants’  uninstall  instruc-
tions  do  not  work.  A  Federal  district  court  granted  a  temporary  restraining  order; 
a preliminary injunction hearing has been scheduled for the near future. Using this 

sonal  computer  in  exchange  for  agreeing  to  purchase  Internet  service)  (consent  order);  Value 
America, Inc., FTC Dkt. No. C–3976 (Sept. 8, 2000) (same). 

2 Federal  Trade  Commission  Staff  Working  Paper,  Dot  Com  Disclosures:  Information  About 
Online  Advertising  (May  3,  2000),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/bcp/conline/pubs/buspubs/
dotcom/index.html. 

3 The Commission recently filed a complaint in Federal court alleging that this failure to dis-
close was deceptive in violation of Section 5 of the FTC Act. The parties stipulated to a prelimi-
nary injunction order, which was entered on October 11, 2005. FTC v. Odysseus Marketing, Inc., 
No.  05–CV–330  (D.N.H.  filed  Sept.  21,  2005),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/opa/2005/10/
odysseus.htm. 

4 In the Matter of Advertising.com, FTC Dkt. No. C–4147 (consent order Sept. 12, 2005), avail-

able at http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0423196/0423196.htm. 

5 Federal Trade Commission, Prepared Statement Before the Committee on Commerce, Science, 
and Transportation Subcommittee on Trade, Tourism, and Economic Development, United States 
Senate (Oct. 5, 2005), available at http://www.ftc.aov/os/testimonv/051005spywaretest.pdf.

6 FTC v. Enternet Media, Inc., No. CV–05–7777 (C.D. Cal. filed Nov. 1, 2005). 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:20 Jun 14, 2006 Jkt 027822 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

27

law enforcement approach, we were also able to freeze $2 million in the defendants’ 
bank accounts. 

Spyware  investigations  and  prosecutions  are  a  priority  for  the  Commission.  We 
are  actively  looking  at  a  wide  variety  of  sources  of  information  about  the  identity 
and  location  of  those  distributing  spyware  that  is  causing  harm  to  American  con-
sumers.  We  are  consulting  with  Federal  and  state  criminal  and  civil  law  enforce-
ment agencies. We also are receiving critical information from high-tech companies, 
such  as  anti-spyware  companies  and  operating  system  companies.  We  further  are 
receiving  valuable  information  from  consumer  groups,  anti-spyware  organization 
websites,  academics,  and  the  technology  press.  I  appreciate  the  assistance  that  we 
are  receiving  from  these  groups,  and  I  look  forward  to  continue  working  with  them 
to make our spyware investigations and prosecutions as effective as possible. 

Thank  you  for  providing  me  with  an  opportunity  to  supplement  my  answers  at 
the hearing concerning the FTC’s law enforcement record as it pertains to spyware. 
If  you  would  like  additional  information,  please  contact  Anna  Davis,  the  Director 
of the Office of Congressional Relations, at (202) 326–3680.

Æ

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:20 Jun 14, 2006 Jkt 027822 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27822.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

